Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4280.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18509. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 18515, an individual granted a license under this part shall meet the following requirements: (a) A licensed bachelor's social worker shall have been awarded a bachelor's degree in social work from a college or university social work program approved by the board and shall have completed at least 2 years of full-time postbachelor's degree experience, or the equivalent in part-time hours, in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. Until July 1, 2008, the required experience in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level shall must be performed under the supervision of a person an individual who has been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in social work from a college or university school of social work. (b) A licensed master's social worker shall have been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in the field of social work from a college or university social work program approved by the board and shall have completed at least 2 years of full-time postmaster's or postdoctoral degree experience, or the equivalent in part-time hours, in the practice of social work at the master's level under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. Until July 1, 2008, the required experience in the practice of social work at the master's level shall must be performed under the supervision of a person an individual who has been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in the field of social work from a college or university school of social work and has engaged in the practice of social work for not less than 2 years. In addition to the requirements set forth in this subdivision, a licensed master's social worker employed by a school district shall meet the requirements for employment as a school social worker contained in the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, and the rules promulgated under that act. (2) The board may grant a limited license to engage in the 2-year postdegree experience required under subsection (1) to an individual who has completed all the educational requirements for licensure as a bachelor's social worker or a master's social worker. A limited license granted under this subsection is renewable for not more than 6 10 years.